Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1038
Nail technology salon, defined.

Nail technology salon means a fixed structure or part thereof licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to serve as the site for the performance of the practices of nail technology by persons licensed under the act.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.05;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 300;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 12.